hfst/noun-som-lex.txt
! NOTE: had to convert multichar symbols to IPA temporarily. Use IPA on the right side, orth on the left.
! dh, sh, kh


! MORPHOLOGICAL NOTES.

! Declension 3: 
! NOTE: mark second vowel with %^; it needs to be deleted in plurals and such.
! NOTE: final obstruents need to be listed on right side with 'voiceless', except for b; for which there is no p.
!       the same follows for n/m alternation; right side has m, left has n.


! Declension 6:
! Final vowel marked with {o}, targetted by rules that change {o}:a in all contexts
! except for before another o


! n/m
! waddan:wadda{m}
! {m} becomes n word finally or before k

LEXICON Nouns
	Noun ;




! These will probably need to be split up into declensions, to handle gender polarity in plurals
! soomaali - soomaaliga (sg), soomaalida (pl); pl marking is tonal, but Determiner agrees with gender changes resulting.

LEXICON Noun
	Masc ;
	Fem ;
	D1 ;
	D2 ;
	D3 ;
	D4 ;
	D5 ;
	D6 ; 
	D7 ;
	Irreg ; 
	Unknown_Declensions ;
	Proper ;


! Some uncategorized items ehre
LEXICON Masc 
sicir NOUNM "price" ; 
dad   NOUNM/NoPlural "people" ;


LEXICON Fem
# ;


! Move to prop
LEXICON Months
Janaayo:Janaayo	NOUNF	"January" ;
Febraayo:Febraayo NOUNF "February" ;
Maarso:Maarso NOUNF "March" ;
Abriil:Abriil NOUNF "April" ;
Maajo:Maajo     NOUNF "May"  ;
Juun:Juun      NOUNF "June"  ;
Luulyo:Luulyo    NOUNF "July"  ;
Agoosto:Agoosto   NOUNF "August"  ;
Sebtember:Sebtember NOUNF "September"  ;
Oktoobar:Oktoobar  NOUNF "October"  ;
Noofembar:Noofembar NOUNF "November"  ;
Disembar:Disembar NOUNF "December" ;



LEXICON Irreg
wax:wax   Irreg_WAX "thing" ;  ! irregular pl. waxyaabo


! Orwin recognizes about 6 (8?) main classes of nouns, some of which break up into separate subgroups depending on various phonological or gender polarity properties... Some notes.

! Declensions 1
! 	GENDER - (sg) mostly fem, (pl) always masc
!   PLURAL - -o
!   SINGULAR - does not end in -o

! 	Stress tones: masc sg. - penultimate vowel
!				  fem  sg. - final vowel
!				  pl       - no stress tone


!   Notes
!		* If sg. ends in -i, then pl is -yo
!		mindí (F)		mindiyo
!		gúri (M)		guriyo, guryo


LEXICON D1
D1_F ;
D1_M ;
D1_F_Col ;
D1_M/SgOnly ;


! Making a lexicon for the things tagged collective in Orwin, just in case.
LEXICON D1_F_Col
khudrad:khudrad 		NOUN1_F "vegetables" ;
caleen:caleen		NOUN1_F "leaves" ; 


LEXICON D1_M
guri:guri	NOUN1_M   "house" ;
buur:buur	NOUN1_M   "mountain" ;
geed:geed	NOUN1_M 		"tree"           ;
gees:gees	NOUN1_M 		"horn"           ;
jidh:jidh		NOUN1_M 		"body"           ;
musqul:musqul	NOUN1_M 		"bathroom"       ;
sanad		NOUN1_M		"year" 		;
walaal		NOUN1_M		"brother"  ; 

! TODO: check paradigms
aakhir		NOUN1_M		"end" ; 

LEXICON D1_M/SgOnly
waqti:waqti		NOUN1_M/SgOnly "time" ;
wakhti:wakhti	NOUN1_M/SgOnly "time" ;
khamri:khamri 	NOUN1_M/SgOnly "wine" ;
carshi:carshi	NOUN1_M/SgOnly "?" ;	




! Declensions 2
! 	GENDER - (sg) mostly masc, (pl) always fem
!   PLURAL - -o (addt'l sound changes)
!   SINGULAR - more than one syll., do not end in -e

! 	Stress tones: masc sg. - penultimate vowel
!				  fem  sg. - final vowel
!				  pl       - no stress tone

! 	Notes:
!
!		* if sg. n ends in [b d dh l r n], then consonant is doubled
!		albáab		albaabbo		doors
!		baabúur		baabuurro		lorries
!		sánad		sanaddo			years
!
!		* if sg. ends in -n, then it changes to -m- intervocalically
!		ínan		inammo			'boy'

!  TODO: some words may not have the doubling: baruuro, *baruurro ? 
!  TODO: baabuur seems to be both, baabuur may support tonal sg/pl and morph: baabuurro, baabuurta/baabuurka
					
LEXICON D2
D2_M ;
D2_F ;
D2_M_Col ;
D2_M_Mass ; 
D2_M_Loan_Pl ; 

LEXICON D2_M_Col
kalluun:kalluu{m}		NOUN2_M		"fish"                   ; ! Seems to have a plural 
raashin		NOUN2_M		"provisions"             ;		   ! Seems not to have a plural 
canab		NOUN2_M "grapes" ; 

! Do something with these. Some are commented out to prevent multiple analyses, but need to have some arabic pl form
LEXICON D2_M_Loan_Pl
masaajid	NOUN2_M "mosque" 					 ;    ! pl?
surwaal		NOUN2_M		"trousers"; ! TODO: saraawiil (m.) pl.
! kursi		NOUN2_M "chair" 					 ;    ! karaasi (f.), kursiyo (f.?); laon

LEXICON D2_M_Mass
shaah		NOUN2_M		"tea" ; 
subag		NOUN2_M 	"butter (esp. clarified butter)" ;
baraf		NOUN2_M		"snow, ice" ; ! TODO: confirm

LEXICON D2_F
quraac	NOUN2_F "breakfast" ; ! TEST:quraac,quraac
subax	NOUN2_F	"morning" ; 
subax+Dec/2F:subax	NOUN2_F	"morning" ; 

! Declensions 3
! 	GENDER - (sg) masc or fem, (pl) always masc
!   PLURAL - -o, but delete final vowel of sg.
!   WORD SHAPE - (C)V(V)CVC
!
!
! 	Stress tones: masc sg. - penultimate vowel
!				  fem  sg. - final vowel
!				  pl       - no stress tone

LEXICON D3
D3_M ;
D3_F ;


LEXICON D3_M
ilig:il%^ik      NOUN3_M "tooth" ;          ! ilig, iligga, ilko, ilkaha
qalin:qal%^i{m}     NOUN3_M "pen" ;            ! ... , qalinka, qalmo, qalmaha
hilib:hil%^ib     NOUN3_M "meat" ;           ! ... , hilibka, hilbo, hilbaha
xadhig:xadh%^ik    NOUN3_M "rope" ;    ! ... , xadhigga, xadhko, xadhkaha
garab:gar%^ab     NOUN3_M "shoulder"  ;      ! ... , garabka, garbo, garbaha
jilib:jil%^ib     NOUN3_M "knee"  ;          ! ... , jilibka, jilbo, jilbaha
waran:war%^a{m}     NOUN3_M "spear"  ;         ! ... , waranka, warmo, warmaha

! note: {m}
LEXICON D3_F
galab:gal%^ab     NOUN3_F "afternoon"  ;     ! ... , galabta , galbo, galbaha
maalin:maal%^i{m}    NOUN3_F "day"  ;           ! ... , maalinta , maalmo, maalmaha
gabadh:gab%^adh    NOUN3_F "girl"  ;          ! ... ,  gabadha , gabdho, gabdhaha
gacan:gac%^a{m}     NOUN3_F "hand"  ;          ! ... ,  gacanta , gacmo, gacmaha
kibis:kib%^is     NOUN3_F "bread"  ;         ! ... ,  kibista , kibso, kibsaha
xubin:xub%^in		NOUN3_F	"member" ; 		! ... , xubinta , xubno, xubnaha


! Could also tag declensions if it's worth it:
! +Decl/3F:gabadh NOUNF "girl" ;

! Declension 4
! 	GENDER - (sg) always masc, (pl) always masc?
!   PLURAL - add -a and copy final consonant
! 			miis -> miisas 'tables'
!			af -> afaf 'mouths, languages'
!			qoys -> qoysas 'famliies'
!			nin -> niman 'men'
!
! always masc? seems to be plenty fem words in this declension also.
! doubt this is always fem in plural too, qoyska / qoysaska


! Get notes for rest of declensions. in meantime... 
! TODO: morphology for this declension doesn't quite work yet.

LEXICON D4
D4_M ;
D4_M_b ; ! qof / qofqof
D4_F ; 
